Georgia, session 2025_26, SB84.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-2-86 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to special license
plates promoting or supporting certain worthy agencies, funds, or nonprofit corporations with
proceeds disbursed to the general fund and the agency, fund, or nonprofit corporation, is
amended in subsection (l) by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(71) A special license plate honoring the Shepherd Center. The funds raised by the sale
of this special license plate shall be disbursed to Shepherd Center, Inc."
S. B. 84
- 1 -

LC 57 0215S (SCS)
SECTION 2.
Said Code section is further amended in subsection (l) by adding a new paragraph to read as
follows:
"(72) A special license plate recognizing the importance of organ donation. The funds
raised by the sale of this special license plate shall be disbursed to the Georgia Transplant
Foundation."
SECTION 3.
(a) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (b) of this section, this Act shall become
effective on July 1, 2025.
(b) Section 2 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.
In accordance with the requirements of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(n) of the
Constitution of the State of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the
requisite two-thirds' majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 84
- 2 -